New Mexico, session 2026, SB195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One million dollars ($1,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of finance and administration for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to contract for training and outreach services for elected officials who serve as supervisors for soil and water conservation districts statewide. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233358.1